Illinois, session 104th, SB3317.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $2,100,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority for a 7grant to Safer Pathways to support the Supportive Reentry 8Network Collaborative, an integrated network that unifies 9clinical care, behavioral health, housing, employment, 10identification restoration, legal benefit access, and care 11coordination into one accountable system that connects people 12who are 90 days pre-release through 12 months and beyond of 13post-release from incarceration to health care, behavioral 14health, stabilization supports, employment and housing using 15close-loop referrals, shared metrics, and a unified data 16system. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182026.